Mississippi, session 2026, SB2751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Deed Fraud Prevention Act." SECTION 2. (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Trusted submitter" means: (i)  A title insurer regulated under Chapter 15, Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972; (ii)  A title company or title agent regulated under Chapter 17, Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972; (iii)  An attorney licensed to practice in this state or any other state; and (iv)  A regulated financial institution, meaning a "bank," "corporation," or "trust company" as defined in Section 81-3-1. (b) "Document" means information inscribed on a tangible medium or stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form. (c)  "Suspicious document" means a document submitted for recording for which the clerk has found any one of the following: (i)  The name or commission information of a notarial officer who has purported to acknowledge or verify the document does not match official commission records; (ii)  The document purports not to be subject to the laws of the United States or this state; (iii)  The document does not conform to recording standards established by other laws of this state; or (iv)  The document has not been submitted for recording by a trusted submitter, or an authorized representative of a trusted submitter, and the document is materially false, fictitious, or fraudulent. (2)  A chancery clerk may: (a)  Refuse to record a suspicious document, unless a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the chancery clerk's finding that the document is a suspicious document is erroneous; (b)  Report a suspicious document to any appropriate law enforcement agency; or (c)  Notify a notarial officer who has purported to acknowledge or verify a suspicious document of the reason for the clerk's finding that the document is a suspicious document. (3)  A person has a cause of action for declaratory or injunctive relief against a chancery clerk for the refusal to record a document based on an allegedly erroneous finding that the document is a suspicious document under this section.  A chancery clerk is not liable for damages or any other claim for monetary relief in an action brought under this subsection. SECTION 3. (1)  Not later than January 1, 2028, each chancery clerk shall establish a property alert notification system that allows a person to enroll real property owned by the person in the system. (2)  A property alert notification system established under this section shall: (a)  Notify the enrolled owner of the recording of any document describing, affecting, or purporting to affect the enrolled property; and (b)  In the notification required by paragraph (1) identify the nature of the document recorded, identify the subject property by address or tax identification number, and provide the recording information of the document. (3)  A property owner may elect to receive any notification provided under this section by mail, text message, call, or email. (4)  There shall be no charge to a property owner for enrolling in the property alert notification system required by this section. (5)  A chancery clerk may by mail notification, website notification, newspaper advertisement, or other media provide property owners with: (a)  Educational information on deed fraud; and (b)  Information about the property alert notification system established under this section. (6)  A chancery clerk is not liable for a violation of this section.  No person shall have a right or cause of action and a chancery clerk is not liable with respect to the establishment, maintenance, or operation of a property alert notification system required by this section. SECTION 4. (1)  A chancery clerk may establish a document alert notification system that allows a notary public to enroll in the system. (2)  A document alert notification system established under this section shall: (a)  Notify the enrolled notary public of the recording of any document containing the name or commission number, if applicable, of the notary public; and (b)  In the notification required by paragraph (1) identify the nature of the document recorded, identify the subject property by address or tax identification number, and provide the recording information of the document. (3)  A notary public may elect to receive any notification provided under this section by mail, text message, call, or email. (4)  There shall be no charge to a notary public for enrolling in the document alert notification system. (5)  A chancery clerk may by mail notification, website notification, newspaper advertisement, or other media provide notaries public with: (a)  Educational information on deed fraud; and (b)  Information about the document alert notification system established under this section. (6)  A chancery clerk is not liable for a violation of this section.  No person shall have a right or cause of action and a chancery clerk is not liable with respect to the establishment, maintenance, or operation of a document alert notification system required by this section. SECTION 5. (1)  A chancery clerk may index or by other means create a searchable log that includes the following information for each document recorded in the chancery clerk's land records: (a)  Information identifying real property described in or purported to be affected by the document; (b)  The name and commission number, if applicable, of any notarial officer described in or identified in the document, along with commissioning jurisdiction of such officer; or (c)  The name of the person that submitted the document for recording. (2)  An index or log created under subsection (1) of this section may be made available for public search and examination in the same manner as any other index for the land records required by other law of this state. SECTION 6.  In determining its continuing education requirements, the Mississippi Real Estate Commission shall consider including courses on fraud and cyber security to be taken by those licensees whose practices may require knowledge in combating real estate related fraud, including deed fraud, wire fraud and cyber security. SECTION 7. (1)  In addition to any judgment quieting title, cancelling a recorded document, or providing declaratory relief, a party alleging damages arising from the recording of a forged deed or mortgage has a cause of action against any of the following: (a)  The person who forged the signature of a property owner on a deed or mortgage; (b)  A person who, with actual knowledge that the deed or mortgage included a forged signature, submitted the document to be recorded in the land records; or (c)  A person with actual knowledge that the vested title to the real property is based on a forged deed, and who purports to sell or encumber the property to someone who is unaware of the forged deed. (2)  In an action against a person described in subsection (1) of this section, a person whose title was purportedly transferred or encumbered by a forged deed or mortgage, or a person who subsequently relied on a forged deed to purchase or encumber the property without knowledge of the forgery, shall be entitled to a monetary judgment consisting of the following: (a)  Compensatory damages; (b)  Statutory damages in an amount not less than two (2) times the compensatory damages; (c)  Attorney's fees; and (d)  Costs. SECTION 8.  Section 97-17-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-41.  (1)  Any person who shall be convicted of taking and carrying away, feloniously, the personal property of another, of the value of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, but less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), shall be guilty of grand larceny, and shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding five (5) years; or shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both.  The total value of property taken and carried away by the person from a single victim shall be aggregated in determining the gravity of the offense. (2)  Any person who shall be convicted of taking and carrying away, feloniously, the personal property of another, of the value of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, but less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), shall be guilty of grand larceny, and shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding ten (10) years; or shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both.  The total value of property taken and carried away by the person from a single victim shall be aggregated in determining the gravity of the offense. (3) Any person who shall be convicted of taking and carrying away, feloniously, the personal property of another, of the value of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or more, shall be guilty of grand larceny, and shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years; or shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both.  The total value of property taken and carried away by the person from a single victim shall be aggregated in determining the gravity of the offense. (4)  (a)  Any person who shall be convicted of taking and carrying away, feloniously, the property of a church, synagogue, temple or other established place of worship, of the value of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, shall be guilty of grand larceny, and shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding ten (10) years, or shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (b)  Any person who shall be convicted of taking and carrying away, feloniously, the property of a church, synagogue, temple or other established place of worship, of the value of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or more, shall be guilty of grand larceny, and shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years, or shall be fined not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both.  The total value of property taken and carried away by the person from a single victim shall be aggregated in determining the gravity of the offense. SECTION 9.  Section 97-17-70, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-70.  (1)  A person commits the crime of receiving stolen property if he intentionally possesses, receives, retains or disposes of stolen property knowing that it has been stolen or having reasonable grounds to believe it has been stolen, unless the property is possessed, received, retained or disposed of with intent to restore it to the owner. (2)  The fact that the person who stole the property has not been convicted, apprehended or identified is not a defense to a charge of receiving stolen property. (3)  (a)  Evidence that the person charged under this section stole the property that is the subject of the charge of receiving stolen property is not a defense to a charge under this section; however, dual charges of both stealing and receiving the same property shall not be brought against a single defendant in a single jurisdiction. (b)  Proof that a defendant stole the property that is the subject of a charge under this section shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant had knowledge that the property was stolen. (4)  Any person who shall be convicted of receiving stolen property which exceeds One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, but less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in value shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a term not exceeding five (5) years or by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (5)  Any person who shall be convicted of receiving stolen property which exceeds Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, but less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) in value shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a term not exceeding ten (10) years or by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (6) Any person who shall be convicted of receiving stolen property which exceeds Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) in value shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a term not exceeding twenty (20) years or by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (7)  Any person who shall be convicted of receiving stolen property which does not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in value may be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if the court finds substantial and compelling reasons why the offender cannot be safely and effectively supervised in the community, is not amenable to community-based treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety.  If such a finding is not made, the court shall suspend the sentence of imprisonment and impose a period of probation not exceeding one (1) year or a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both.  Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this subsection where the value of the property is not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), shall be imprisoned in the Penitentiary for a term not exceeding three (3) years or fined an amount not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. SECTION 10.  Section 6 of this act shall be published within Chapter 35, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.